

	RACEYA Trademark of RaceYa, inc. Serial Number: 86286573 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Toys and Sporting Goods Products
RACEYA










 
Get FREE email alerts













RACEYA  Trademark Information
 RaceYa, inc
Electronic toy vehicles; Electronically operated toy motor vehicles; Radio controlled toy vehicles; Remote control toys, namely, cars; Toy cars; Toy model cars; Toy model kit cars
Mobile retail store services featuring toys; On-line retail store services featuring toys; Retail Toy stores




Perfect for these industries

Toys and Sporting Goods Products
Advertising,  Business & Retail Services





Words that describe this mark
electronic   toy   vehicles   electronically   operated   toy   motor   vehicles   radio   controlled   toy   vehicles   remote   control   toys         cars   toy   cars   toy   model   cars   toy   model   kit    
                                    




This is a brand page for the RACEYA trademark by RaceYa, inc 
                                in New York, NY, 10014.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this RACEYA trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner RaceYa, inc of the RACEYA trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the RACEYA trademark.
                           


Status Update!
                          On Tuesday, July 4, 2017, status on the RACEYA trademark changed to FIFTH EXTENSION - GRANTED.
                        






On Tuesday, May 20, 2014,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        RACEYA by 
                        RaceYa, inc, New York, NY  10014.
                        The USPTO has given the RACEYA 
                        trademark serial  number of  86286573.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is FIFTH EXTENSION - GRANTED.
                        The correspondent listed for RACEYA is 
                        
                        
                                            Brian D. Thomas of 
                                            Sheehan Phinney Bass & Green PA,  1000 Elm Street, 17th Floor, 1000 Elm Street, 17th Floor Manchester NH 03101
                                .
                            The RACEYA trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Toys and Sporting Goods Products
                                , 
                                    Advertising,  Business & Retail Services
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for RACEYA 
                            is Electronic toy vehicles; Electronically operated toy motor vehicles; Radio controlled toy vehicles; Remote control toys, namely, cars; Toy cars; Toy model cars; Toy model kit cars. 
                            





Word mark:
 RACEYA


  Status/Status Date:  


FIFTH EXTENSION - GRANTED

7/4/2017



  Serial Number:  
86286573


  Filing Date:  
5/20/2014


 Registration Number:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Registration Date:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Goods and Services: 
Electronic toy vehicles; Electronically operated toy motor vehicles; Radio controlled toy vehicles; Remote control toys, namely, cars; Toy cars; Toy model cars; Toy model kit cars


 Mark Description: 
NOT AVAILABLE


 Type Of Mark: 
Service Mark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
10/14/2014


Last Applicant/Owner:

RaceYa, incNew York, NY  10014
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Standard Character Mark


 Design Search: 


(NO DATA)



Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 (NOT AVAILABLE)


 Correspondent:


Brian D. Thomas
Sheehan Phinney Bass & Green PA
1000 Elm Street, 17th Floor
1000 Elm Street, 17th Floor
Manchester NH 03101





 Intent to Use Trademark - Applicant has not submitted proof of use in commerce the the USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (028) - Games and playthings; gymnastic and sporting articles not included in other classes; decorations for Christmas trees. 


First Use Anywhere: 
Not provided


First Use In Commerce: 
Not provided




Primary Class: 
 Class (035) - Advertising; business management; business administration; office functions. 


First Use Anywhere: 
Not provided


First Use In Commerce: 
Not provided





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your RACEYA trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

7/4/2017
FIFTH EXTENSION - GRANTED


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



Brian D. Thomas


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of RACEYA trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search raceya on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for RACEYA 




RACEYA is providing Electronic toy vehicles; Electronically operated toy motor vehicles; Radio controlled toy vehicles; Remote control toys, namely, cars; Toy cars; Toy model cars; Toy model kit cars.
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 




















Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














Raya Cosmetic Manufacturing Company in Los Angeles



























 PRIVATE LABEL PROFESSIONAL PRODUCTS 



 





























 



USA:
1-(800)-525-7292         INTERNATIONAL:
1-(818)-763-7292          FAX:1-(818)-760-1069


FDA
Registered 











Private Label Options


Private Label Options
Ordering Info
Contact Info
Product Manual
Company profile
Home Page





Products


Cleansers
Toners
Moisturizers
Nourishing
Age Controls
Masques
Problem Skin
Alpha-Hydroxy
SPA and Body
Depilatory





Prices


Products
Bulk
Retail size prices





Helpful Links


Ingredients
Conversions
World Clock
Calendar
World Weather




Feedback


Feedback Info




























PROFESSIONAL HIGH QUALITY SKIN CARE PRODUCTS


for Skin Care Salons, Day Spas, Medical Spas,


Professional Estheticians, and for Export








Please print Product Manual and Product Catalogue





WE OPEN YOUR DOOR TO SUCCESS!


PRIVATE LABEL PRODUCTS FROM STOCKS-RETAIL, PROFESSIONAL, BULK SIZES













EXPERIENCE AND COMPARE RAYA's UNIQUE QUALITY AT EXCELLENT PRICES








Raya Taver immigrated from Russia and began in Los Angeles in 1979
as a licensed esthetician trying to find an affordable skin care line for her
one room operation. When she approached the established skin care lines with
their prohibitive sales policies, inflated prices, and high minimums she decided
to start her own professional highest quality and affordable skin care product
line.







As time passed, her small skin care line evolved into a state-of-the-art, 100,000 sq. ft. (10,000 sq. m) cosmetic research, development and manufacturing facility in North Hollywood (Los Angeles), California, now known worldwide as RAYA Laboratories, Inc. (www.rayalab.com), with over 200 high quality products available from stock for immediate delivery. All RAYA products, containers, and packaging are 100% made in Los Angeles (to avoid any interruptions, import restrictions and time delay in delivery, unscheduled price increases).







In addition, her one room facial salon became Raya Day Spa, one of the largest 3 story (12,000 ft sq.-1,200 sq.m) and most successful and affordable Day Spa's in Beverly Hills/ Los Angeles area (www.rayaspa.com)







 Time-proven highest quality (get samples and compare),



 Low prices (advantage to purchase direct from the manufacturer),


 No first-order minimum,


 Large selection with immediate shipping from stock,


 Effective professional formulas,


 Excellent technical support,


 Sample packs and complimentary samples






Raya for 30 years has been loyally
dedicated to supporting thousands of skin care professionals in their journey
towards creating a profitable, reliable and manageable business, many of whom
from humble beginnings have grown into very successful full service salons and
spas, and are using and retailing Raya's Product to remain successful and profitable
in the very competitive and ever changing skin care industry.

















PURCHASE FACTORY DIRECT!






RAYA
Laboratories, Inc. (founded in1982) is a Los Angeles based and California Registered
Corporation uses US and worldwide Registered trade names: RAYA®,  Spa
International®   Euroline®


 Raya® believes that manufacturing in
America is the strength of our future, and our new state of the art 100,000
ft. sq.(10,000 sq m.) plant is proof of significant
manufacturing capacity, global commercial scale and a committed focus on quality
and customer service.


















































 





     
 






           
 




















DISCOVER ONE SOURCE FOR OVER 200 PROFESSIONAL HIGHEST QUALITY SKIN CARE PRODUCTS


100% MADE IN LOS ANGELES, CALIFORNIA


with worldwide compatible and affordable wholesale prices


Ready for shipment
















Constant Evaluation of Product Performance







RAYA Laboratories, Inc. supplies its products (only under private label or bulk) to thousands of skin care salons, spas, dermatologists, and plastic surgeons worldwide. Their continued use and enthusiastic recommendations to their customers over the decades attests to the superior quality and consistent performance of RAYA® professional private label line of skin care products.















In order to assess the products performance
in a true retail environment, RAYA Laboratories, Inc. for last 32 years conducts,
in its own RAYA European Day Spa, continuous panel studies on product efficacy
and client / product satisfaction. 22 experienced estheticians in RAYA Day Spa
continuously use these products under RAYA brand name during the facials and recommend to the spa customers
as a daily regimen. So each product in the line get complete and guarantied professional
and customer satisfaction. 







RAYA Day Spa (www.rayaspa.com) is
3 story (12,000 sq. ft. -1,200 sq. m.) modern spa facility (built and maintained
by RAYA Laboratories, Inc.) located in the heart of Beverly Hills / West Hollywood
area of Los Angeles. This one of the finest Day Spa in the country for over 32
years is using only and exclusively RAYA® products line (in facial rooms and
retail) the identically same products (from the same batches) RAYA Laboratories,
Inc. distributes (in bulk and retail sizes) to wholesale customers factory direct
under private label only.

























Distributed Factory Direct







Exclusively to Salons, Spas, Physicians, Licensed Aestheticians,







Cosmetology/ Esthetics Schools and for Export







in retail sizes, professional sizes, and bulk.













Make a Qualified Choice







Is the professional brand-name product line that you are currently promoting and selling in your salon, now easily available to your customers on the Internet, or in a Beauty Supply Store near you (possibly at a better price than you can offer).. 







Are you and your customers satisfied with the quality and efficacy of the professional products and supplies being used and sold in your Salon or Spa..? ... have you asked for our free samples Program and compared our Famous European Quality..?







Are the prices that you are now paying for professional skin care products and supplies attractive and profitable to you..? ...have you done your homework and compared them with our impressive prices ..?







4. Are you aware that some manufacturers and distributors of the well known exclusive in the past salon and spa products (to lower their costs) transferred the formulations, know how, and processing to developing countries ...?







You will find the answers to these questions and solutions to many other professional concerns when you progress through our Web Site







... Skin Care Professional: Stay Secure in Era of political and economic uncertainties ... 







Important and helpful to know :







The Internet and Globalization have created mass access to products that were designed to be exclusively sold at professional Salons and Spa. This new trend is forcing salons and Spas around the world to find alternative paths to compete and prosper







Traditionally, Salons and Spas were using professional (domestic and foreign) popular brand-name skin care products. Up to recent past, these brands were truly exclusive. Only professionals were able to purchase these products wholesale, and only through distribution channels designated by manufacturers. This process of distribution granted you a professional advantage and exclusiveness over products available in department and beauty-supply stores







Current global marketing developments such as the implementation of sales through the Internet have virtually eliminated this exclusivity. Inevitably, the Internet has made it possible for your loyal customers to access the brand-name product that you sell in your salon, in a much faster, more convenient, and more affordable way. The distributors that you rely on for your "exclusivity" are no longer able to control the spread of countless websites that offer consumers the identical brand-name products found previously only at professional Salons and Spas like yours







Now literally anyone can purchase retail in a Beauty Supply store or Online almost any salon brand-name product,







 







They are widely available on countless Internet sites 






 






This Trend Is Already Affecting Your Business:







Diminished the professional image of your Salon; 







Diminished your role as a provider of an exclusive product line; 







Inevitably caused the significant decline of your product sales and customer loyalty.







You have worked hard to establish your practice. You have struggled to maintain your clientele. You have invested monetarily as well as emotionally. Now is the time to safeguard and protect your investment.








 





MAKE A SMART MOVE TOWARD YOUR PRIVATE LABEL





Compare RAYA® quality and prices with products you are using now












Recognize, that only promoting your own name on private label (see Options of Private Labeling) skin care and cosmetic products will protect you from having your business and profits undercut by new marketing trends.






Now, as never before, it has become necessary for Salons, Spas, Estheticians, and Dermatologists to promote their name click here on their retail and back-bar products so that they can be protected from declining customer sales and loyalty.






By establishing your name on the label, you are promoting yourself, not other existing brand-named companies, and you are securing your own business. 







By buying directly from the cosmetic manufacturing company, you bypass the middle-man distribution chain and substantially cut your costs. Compare RAYA®'s prices.







In addition, by incorporating our in-salon custom blending click here techniques, you are able to customize treatments to your clients' individual needs. As a result, you are better equipped to compete in the ever-expanding and diverse skin care market.







Discover RAYA® Superior Quality and attractive prices. Compare with Brand Name Products you are using now














With Your Name on the product and our time proven European quality you are progressively securing a place for yourself in the rapidly changing market. 









 















USA: 1-(800)-525-7292 

INTERNATIONAL: 1-(818)-763-7292 

FAX: 1-(818)-760-1069








E-mail: rosawest@aol.com




















Private Label Options


Private Label Options
Ordering Info
Contact Info
Product Manual
Company profile
Home Page





Products


Cleansers
Toners
Moisturizers
Nourishing
Age Controls
Masques
Problem Skin
Alpha-Hydroxy
SPA and Body
Depilatory





Prices


Products
Bulk
Retail size prices





Helpful Links


Ingredients
Conversions
World Clock
Calendar
World Weather




Feedback


Feedback Info















Copyright@2000-2014   Privacy
policy


















Companies Archives - Futureworks


























































 
 









Announcements, Companies, Featured, Futureworks Incubator  Futureworks Incubator launches with 13 Manufacture & Scale startups			 May 24, 2017On Wednesday, May 17, we launched NYCEDC’s Futureworks Incubator with a kickoff event at A/D/O in Greenpoint. The Incubator champions and supports the growth of 45 hardware startups across NYC and builds on the success of the New York’s Next Top Makers program. From smart basketballs to underwater drones, the city’s entrepreneurs are creating a new manufacturing ecosystem, and we’re bringing them all together. Below are the 13 growth-stage startups in our Manufacture & Scale cohort. Over the next nine months, we’ll be working closely with each team to help them produce locally, recruit talent, streamline operations, tell their stories and raise capital. 
Futureworks Incubator is designed and run by global innovation agency SecondMuse and Chelsea-based Imagination in Space. Get to know the companies below as well as the 32 Market Validation companies which we broke out into these two posts. Join the Futureworks community to learn about subsidized production and contract manufacturing opportunities through Futureworks Shops. Or, follow along on Instagram and Twitter.

Astrohaus
Astrohaus is a New York City-based product-design company founded by Adam Leeb and Patrick Paul. In January 2015, they launched Freewrite, a smart typewriter with an e-ink screen, via a successful $342,000 Kickstarter campaign. In May 2016, Astrohaus shipped the typewriter to 1000 backers. Freewrite lets users write anywhere, sync their work online through the cloud, but without all the digital distractions like email and web-browsing that stop you from becoming the next Hemingway. It’s a tool for professional and aspiring writers and available at Amazon, Barnes and Noble and GetFreewrite.com. Today the Detroit-born company is a five-person team that’s refining Freewrite as well as designing new products like Sprinter, a distraction-free Web app. Get to know Astrohaus and join them on Instagram and Twitter.

DribbleUp
When Cofounder Marc Forkosh was in 6th grade, he was cut from his school’s basketball team. Crying his eyes out, he came home determined to get better. He dedicated himself to hours of watching training videos and practicing in the driveway. Like most kids, he couldn’t afford a trainer and practiced alone. By the end of high school, he was captain of the basketball team. After graduation, it dawned on Marc: he could use his smartphone camera to track performance and give live feedback like his own virtual trainer. Marc, now 20, team up with his brother Eric, a former investment partner at Dorm Room Fund to invent DribbleUp, the smart basketball that helps kids like Marc train effectively and affordably anytime, anywhere. Since launching in August 2016, DribbleUp’s sold thousands of balls around the world and is the #1 smart basketball on Amazon. Get to know DribbleUp and join them on Instagram and Twitter.

Duro UAS
Duro UAS (Unmanned Autonomous Systems) helps make cities safer by manufacturing underwater drones and components for infrastructure inspection, environmental research and more. Duro allows the government, scientists and companies to collect marine data that is cheaper, safer, faster and higher-quality than legacy methods in many circumstances, allowing for more of this critical information to be gathered and utilized than ever before. Well-connected throughout the city, Duro is currently performing a bridge inspection grant in partnership with a local college and the US Department of Transportation, and collaborates with organizations such as the Billion Oyster Project on mapping the NYC marine ecosystem, among others. Get to know Duro UAS and join them on Instagram and Twitter.

 
iDu Optics
Capturing photos and videos through a microscope is a basic requirement in fields like medicine, life science, education, jewelry and microelectronics. But image-acquisition systems are expensive ($5,000+) and complicated. iDu Optics’ LabCam is an iPhone clip-on adapter that lets people take high-quality microscopic pictures that are equal to, or better than, the $5,000 options. Harvard, Penn, Stanford and University of Chicago are all iDu clients, and Amazon reviewers give LabCam 4.5/5-star reviews. Founder Du Cheng is an MD-PhD student at Weill Cornell and iDu recently won the Weill Cornell Business Plan Challenge. Get to know iDu, see the LabCam in action and join them on Facebook.
Lotik
Shane Eten and Ely Greenberg founded Lotik from Manhattan’s Samsung Accelerator in November 2015. Their objective was to create a wireless sensor capable of providing real estate owners a better understanding of how and where water was being used within their buildings. Lotik sensors provide real-time, point-of-use water data, and are installed on the outside of pipes. Unlike traditional flow meters, Lotik sensors can be installed in seconds and don’t require tools. When a leak occurs, Lotik lets clients know through text or email. They’re currently working with product-development firms, property owners and piloting the technology with Brooklyn Public Library. Get to know Lotik
 
MICRO
MICRO is building a fleet of six-foot-tall science museums. Brick-and-mortar museums are clustered in well-resourced neighborhoods and entry is often expensive. Science museums, especially, are in high demand, but they’re rare. By creating a scalable museum model, MICRO brings science museums everywhere. They work with researchers, designers and storytellers to squeeze complex ideas into boxes the size of vending machines. In their first museum, the Smallest Mollusk Museum, the story of snails, octopuses and giant squids engage visitors in a 700-million-year battle to survive. MICRO’s showcased at the New Museum, NEW INC, New Lab, the Billion Oyster Project’s display house on Governors Island and the Submerge Marine Science Festival. Cofounder Amanda Schochet worked as a computational ecologist with NASA prior to starting MICRO with Charles Philipp, who spent a decade working as a media producer. Get to know MICRO and join them on Instagram and Twitter.

Olivia Knox
Olivia Knox is a manufacturing collective based in New York City and Uganda that specializes in Ankole horn. It is 100% female-owned and managed by Ugandan-American entrepreneur Olivia Byanyima and her American cofounder, Shanley Knox. Olivia Knox’s replicable model develops localized, effective industries around materials for use in global markets. The vast majority of cause­-oriented supply chains in Africa are built by NGOs and small individual brands. NGOs, while very effective in raising awareness, are not profit driven and therefore bring products to market at less than market value. Olivia Knox believes that creative industries in Africa can only be scaled through profitable businesses that price quality African goods competitively alongside Western products. Olivia Knox works with Selima Optique, The Line, Dannijo, Bloomingdale’s, Bird and Cage and Oscar De La Renta, among others. Their mission is to build out their manufacturing supply chain here in NYC. Get to know Olivia Knox and join them on Instagram.

Pensa Labs
Pensa Labs is the brainchild of Pensa, the Brooklyn-based design firm with a track record of developing successful products, brands and strategies. Pensa firmly believes that the world can be continuously improved through understanding people and providing them with great design and a bit of clever invention. Pensa Labs’ D.I.Wire allows for mass customization or short-run production of wire forms. Currently, forming wire for medical or industrial applications is either time consuming, expensive or requires high minimum-order quantities. Get to know Pensa Labs and join them on Instagram and Twitter. 

PlayDate
PlayDate is building out technology for pets and their owners. PlayDate’s first product is a camera-enabled ball that lets pet owners interact with their dog or cat from anywhere in the world using their mobile app. They’ve raised more than $800,000 on Indiegogo and are the highest-grossing pet technology campaign to date on any platform. PlayDate is a graduate of the Entrepreneur Roundtable Accelerator. Get to know PlayDate and join them on Facebook.

Poursteady
Poursteady brings speed, precision, and reliability to high-end commercial coffee retailers (and better coffee to discerning customers) by combining precision motion-control, elegant design and beautiful fabrication. The idea for Poursteady was born when two of the founders watched a busy barista attempt to make three pour-over coffees at once in a busy coffee shop in California. At the 2013 Maker Faire in NYC, Poursteady debuted the first prototype and made more than 800 cups of coffee. Since then, they’ve sold more 70 systems to coffee shops and offices everywhere that have in turn made hundreds of thousands of cups of coffee. Clients include Whole Foods, Cafe Grumpy and others. Poursteady is an NYCEDC Next Top Makers alumnus and Futureworks NYC Growth Initiative Grant awardee. Get to know Poursteady and join them on Instagram and Twitter.
 
StrongArm
StrongArm is defining the field of Industrial BioTelemetrics – the science of human data collection and analytics to inform the development and delivery of precise interventions to improve safety, efficiency and productivity. In the unpredictable world of workplace injuries, StrongArm innovates with data science and smart algorithms to bring accurate safety insights and a peace of mind to the manual worker – who they call Industrial Athletes. StrongArm’s FUSE IIoT Platform assesses, diagnoses and predicts injuries before they happen, and the FLx and V22 ErgoSkeletons protect workers by improving lifting ergonomics and reducing lower back injury risk factors. Founder Sean Petterson launched StrongArm based on his experience with family members working strenuous blue collar jobs, and recognizing that the manufacturing worker rarely receives the training and support they need to ensure proper lifting mechanics. He is a Forbes 30 Under 30 awardee, and StrongArm is a Next Top Makers alumnus. Get to know StrongArm and join them on Twitter and Instagram.

Thimble
Thimble is a subscription service that delivers DIY electronics kits to your door every month. Along with the kits, Thimble provides guidance, increasingly challenging projects and continuing education. Without helpful guidance and rewarding progression, users become disengaged with projects and end up not learning the material needed to get better and better. Founders Oscar Pedroso and David Brenner met while teaching electronics at a makerspace. Thimble is a Next Top Makers alumnus and raised $300,000 on Kickstarter. Get to know Thimble and join them on Twitter and Instagram.

Voltaic Systems
Voltaic Systems is a Brooklyn-based solar company focused on small-scale charging solutions. The company was founded when it launched the original solar backpack, a new concept at the time which has since spawned a competitive new market. Their products are used for mobile charging by adventurers, aid organizations, and travelers of all types. Voltaic has also expanded its line to include solar panels and batteries for standalone use, particularly for IOT and industrial applications. More recently they designed and launched a line of solar lights, with a view to providing better solutions for developing countries and emergency situations. Founder Shayne McQuade is an Australian-born entrepreneur. Having worked in Tokyo, London and Melbourne, he settled in New York after coming for an MBA at Columbia University. Through Voltaic he continues to develop opportunities to leverage solar energy to promote social and environmental benefits. Get to know Voltaic Systems and join them on Instagram and Twitter.
May 24, 2017/by Greg Spielberg

http://futureworks.nyc/wp-content/uploads/2017/05/Incubator-track-3.jpg
1071
1500

Greg Spielberg

https://dev-futureworks.pantheonsite.io/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/futureworks_large_rgb.svg

Greg Spielberg2017-05-24 18:17:272017-06-13 21:09:01Futureworks Incubator launches with 13 Manufacture & Scale startupsAnnouncements, Companies, Featured, Futureworks Incubator  Futureworks Incubator launches with 32 Market Validation startups (Here’s 1-16)			 On Wednesday, May 17, we launched NYCEDC’s Futureworks Incubator with a kickoff event at A/D/O in Greenpoint. The Incubator champions and supports the growth of hardware startups across NYC and builds on the success of the New York’s Next Top Makers program. Below are 16 of the startups in our Market Validation cohort. From ELIA Life, creating a new language for the blind, to Bonbouton’s smart shoe sensors, these companies are tackling internationally relevant problems through NYC manufacturing innovation. Over the next nine months, we’ll be working closely with each team to help them produce locally, recruit talent, streamline operations, tell their stories and set them up to raise capital. 
Futureworks Incubator is designed and run by global innovation agency SecondMuse and Chelsea-based Imagination in Space. Get to know the companies below as well as the 13 Manufacture & Scale companies and the additional 16 Market Validation startups. Join the Futureworks community to learn about subsidized production and contract manufacturing opportunities through Futureworks Shops. Or, follow along on Instagram and Twitter.
Bonbouton
Bonbouton creates cutting-edge sensor technology embedded into smart wearables to improve health care. Their proprietary graphene sensors passively monitor the skin’s physiological signals to predict injury, detect infection and monitor muscular activity. They are currently developing detective sneakers to prevent the development of ulcers in diabetic patients. Bonbouton is the recipient of a National Science Foundation grant, are an NYCEDC Next Top Makers alumnus, a 1776 Health Fellow and an NYCEDC Digital Health Breakthrough Network awardee. Get to know Bonbouton and join them on Twitter.
 
Dagmy Motors
Dagmy Motors is an advanced energy and transportation company creating price-competitive clean energy and transportation solutions. Dagmy Motors is working to make high-powered electric vehicles more affordable. Their main focus? The prohibitively expensive battery packs and battery technology. Dagmy is developing the highest-energy density, but lowest-cost battery pack on the market today. The Dagmy battery pack achieves a 70% increase in energy density at half the price of the Tesla Motors’ battery pack. Get to know Dagmy Motors and join them on Twitter.
 
Danielle Trofe Design
Danielle Trofe Design is a Brooklyn-based design studio that promotes a function-forward, sustainable and socially responsible approach to furniture and lighting design. Danielle aims to encourage a departure from conventional materials and production techniques in search of long-term, sustainable solutions. At the intersection of science, technology and design, Danielle Trofe Design’s worked with BMW, Brooklyn Botanic Garden and US Botanic Garden in DC. Her MushLume Lighting Collection is made of mushroom mycelium. Get to know Danielle Trofe and join her on Instagram and Twitter.
 
ELIA Life
99% of people who have a visual impairment cannot read Braille. Without literacy, they suffer higher unemployment rates, high school dropout rates, and lower levels of independence than Braille readers. ELIA developed a new foundation for a modern reading system and is integrating the language into mainstream visual-impairment culture. ELIA is bringing greater opportunities in education, employment, literacy and independence to the blind. They work with NEW INC, The Good Work Institute, Columbia Teachers College Center for Technology Change in Schools, the SUNY College of Optometry, Lighthouse Guild International and VISIONS Services for the Blind. Get to know ELIA Life.
 
Fit A.I.
Fit A.I is a sports-tech hardware company that empowers sports coaches and athletes to quantify strength training data. By creating a data-driven frontier, Fit A.I. can minimize fatigue and optimize athletic performance in a simple, scalable and inexpensive way. The startup was founded to fundamentally improve how physical wellness is measured and attained. A data-driven approach to training and fitness helped Cofounder Tim Nugmanov shed 20 pounds and transform his athletic career. Based on more than a hundred industry interviews, the team found a laser-focus in helping collegiate athletics quantify, analyze, optimize strength training to reach peak sports performance. Currently, collegiate coaches and athletes spend hours on collecting mostly unreliable and antiquated strength training data. This approach works decently for individuals but rapidly breaks at scale. Get to know Fit A.I. and join them on Twitter.
 
GrowSquares
One morning a few years back, one of our founders went to water his Brooklyn apartment’s vegetable garden only to find it had been destroyed by bugs overnight. Like most people, he felt a bit defeated and started thinking how to better design next year’s garden. Unlike most people however, he decided to quit his job and spend the next couple of years designing a solution. What GrowSquares quickly realized was something most urban gardeners have known for decades: growing vegetables inside a city is tough. Buildings can create irregular and inconsistent shadows, scattered parks limit natural pollinators and crowded spaces often results in dirty air. Our platform lets even first time urban gardeners grow beautiful herbs, fruits & vegetables with ease. The team works with the Healthy Materials Lab to help develop their product and the Queens County Farm to test them. Get to know GrowSquares.
 
Hoplite Power
Hoplite’s story started at a bar in NYC’s East Village when Cofounders Leo Tawilian and Jordan Mayerson were hanging out. Then the familiar happened: Leo’s phone died. He asked the bartender if he could charge it, and the bartender politely direct him to a charging locker. When Leo realized that the charging station required him to lock away his phone in a crowded bar, he hesitated. Then the idea came to them: If bike sharing and car sharing are possible, then why couldn’t they build a network for power sharing? Hoplite provides fully charged portable batteries that can be taken from location to location, and hubs that are designed to fit seamlessly into any aesthetic environment. Hoplite was launched in January 2017. Within a few months, they’ve expanded their network to cover much of the Greenwich Village area, the LES, as well as parts of Brooklyn. With hundreds of uses and great feedback, they are on track to reach our vision of a full power sharing network in the near future. All of their development and assembly is done inhouse at NYDesigns in Long Island City. Get to know Hoplite Power and join them on Instagram and Twitter.
 
Innovative Neurons
Innovative Neurons is commercializing the patented Auto-Retractable Multi-Needle Syringe called “FAST” (Fast, Accessible, Safe, Technology). FAST will drastically decrease the 400,000+ Needle Stick Incidents (NSI) per year in the USA that endanger clinician’s lives; they also plan to aggressively reduce the time-intensive cost to inject patients with multiple injections. The cost savings from reducing NSI by 29% is around $100 Million per year. The world market of safety syringes will reach $6.7 billion by 2019. Get to know Innovative Neurons.
 
Move38
Move38, an MIT Media Lab spinoff, seeks to delight hands, challenge minds and inspire curiosity. They believe people learn best when at play, and that our play shapes who we are. Move38 is making table games smart, and making smart games social. They’re creating a new kind of tabletop game, with components that think for themselves, talk to each other, and come alive under your fingertips. Get to know Move38 and join them on Twitter.
 
QuiO
QuiO is a connected therapeutics company that improves clinical trials and disease management through remote monitoring of home injections. They provide smart injection devices and connected software for monitoring, engaging and supporting patients taking injectable therapies. QuiO’s devices make self-injection easy and reliable for patients while passively recording each dosing event. Data is then wirelessly sent to their cloud-based ConnectedRx platform without requiring patient input, a smartphone or syncing. The dose-level data can be securely shared through the platform with loved ones, care teams and customers including health insurers and pharmaceutical companies. QuiO is an NYCEDC Digital Health Breakthrough Network awardee. Get to know QuiO and join them on Twitter.
 

RaceYa
RaceYa is on a mission to help kids fail. They use fast, customizable, radio-controlled cars to teach kids about power of iteration, experimentation and persistence.  Starting with a raceable science kit and expanding out into an immersive universe of customization, STEM education and collaboration, RaceYa is building a community of fearless kids. Get to know RaceYa and join them on Instagram and Twitter.
 
Spacial
Will Chatham is a professional drone pilot who was asked to film a large stadium event but couldn’t get approval to fly a drone indoors over people. He realized that blimps were a great solution but there was nothing available with today’s most advanced capabilities. Sharing his problem with the other two founders, they realized that there was a huge opportunity for a smart blimp, and they started experimenting with blimp technology. Stadiums, arenas and other large crowd events are missing out on the drone revolution. Spacial brings the best drone technology safely over crowds in stadiums, arenas and other large crowd events. Get to know Spacial and join them on Instagram and Twitter.
 
Teleobjects
Teleobjects is a brand introducing a new generation of everyday connected products. They prototyped with funding from Verizon Connected Futures program, validated alongside the NYC Media Lab’s Combine program and is a member at NEW INC. Get to know Teleobjects.
 
Urban Leaf
Urban Leaf believes that the future of food is fresh, local and personal. They make growing food at home fun, easy and accessible through hydroponic products. They have close relationships with a number of the commercial players in the New York AgTech scene, including Blue Planet, Farm.One, Edenworks, Cloud Farms and Square Roots. Get to know Urban Leaf and join them on Instagram and Twitter.
 
Wearable Media
Wearable Media is a creative e-textile service platform providing e-textile technologies for high-tech fashion products development. Their core team consists of three women from the tech and fashion industry: Yuchen Zhang, Jingwen Zhu and Hellyn Teng. Graduates of the Parsons Design and Technology Program and NYU Interactive Telecommunications Program, they focus on developing e-textile technologies, and high tech fashion designs. Recent projects have been showcased in Paris Fashion Week, SXSW, NYU Climate Action Conference and Creative Technology Week NYC. Wearable Media products are user-friendly and require minimal knowledge in electronic engineering and coding. Get to know Wearable Media and join them on Instagram.
 
WearWorks
WearWorks delivers products and experiences that communicate information through touch. Their first product is called Wayband, a wearable haptic navigation device for the blind and visually impaired. WearWorks specializes in haptics that provide information in an intuitive, non-obtrusive way. They are NYCEDC Next Top Makers and Urban-X accelerator alumni. Get to know WearWorks.
May 24, 2017/by Greg Spielberg

http://futureworks.nyc/wp-content/uploads/2017/05/Incubator-track2.jpg
1000
1500

Greg Spielberg

https://dev-futureworks.pantheonsite.io/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/futureworks_large_rgb.svg

Greg Spielberg2017-05-24 18:15:432017-05-24 18:21:49Futureworks Incubator launches with 32 Market Validation startups (Here's 1-16)Announcements, Companies, Featured, Futureworks Incubator  Futureworks Incubator launches with 32 Market Validation startups (Here’s 17-32)			 On Wednesday, May 17, we launched NYCEDC’s Futureworks Incubator with a kickoff event at A/D/O in Greenpoint. The Incubator champions and supports the growth of hardware startups across NYC and builds on the success of the New York’s Next Top Makers program. Below are 16 of the 32 startups in our Market Validation cohort. From Active Hands’ assistive rehabilitation equipment to Secco’s insta-cleaning technology, NYC-based companies are focused on improving quality of life. Over the next nine months, we’ll be working closely with each team to help them produce locally, recruit talent, streamline operations, tell their stories and set them up to raise capital.
Futureworks Incubator is designed and run by global innovation agency SecondMuse and Chelsea-based Imagination in Space. Get to know the companies below as well as the 13 Manufacture & Scale startups and the additional 16 Market Validation companies. Join the Futureworks community to learn about subsidized production and contract manufacturing opportunities through Futureworks Shops. Or, follow along on Instagram and Twitter.
 
Active Hands
Therapists currently have no means of qualitatively monitoring home-based therapy. Active Hands’ device uses RFID technology to identify functional task-specific objects and monitors how they are used. They recently won the Kaylie Hardware Prize, and $50,000 from Zahn Innovation Center. Active Hands’ initial product development was sponsored by clinician/researcher Dr. Kathleen Friel at Burke Rehabilitation Hospital in White Plains. Their products help people with disabilities make better use of their hands and arms through gripping aids and assistive technology. Get to know Active Hands and join them on Facebook.


Allied Microbiota
Allied Microbiota is an environmental biotechnology company that develops and commercializes sustainable and energy-efficient products to remove toxic organic pollutants from the environment and industrial waste streams. A spin-off of Columbia Technology Ventures, Allied Microbiota cleans up toxic pollutants in soil, sediments and groundwater using microbes. Get to know Allied Microbiota.
 
CUBIC
After having his bike stolen for the third time, Founder and CEO Shabazz Stuart leveraged his experience in the public policy and public space realm to design a concept for smart, elegant, modular, secure bike parking. The kiosk is designed to scale and will be operated as a network with placemaking in mind. Eventually the kiosk will be able to provide space for other uses such as concessionaires and vendors. Shabazz Stuart worked at the Downtown Brooklyn Partnership for three-and-a-half years under the leadership of President Tucker Reed. Get to know CUBIC.
 
Design Innovation 360
Design Innovation 360 was born when forensic photographer and Founder Chris Landano got tangled in debris during a building collapse rescue. His Trakbelt360 tool belt lets users slide and release tool pockets and holsters as needed. It also creates equal weight distribution for safer work. Get to know Design Innovation 360.
 
eKick Technologies
Proud to be established in Harlem, Ekick Technologies was founded by City College of New York students with a desire to make things that move with you. Their Torpedo Lights allow skateboarders to be seen at night on and off the road as well as to see rocks and potholes ahead of them. Get to know eKick and join them on Instagram.
 
Emrals
The story of Emrals begins in the spring of 2014 when Sean Auriti and Alan Minor were chatting at Alpha One Labs and came up with the idea for a smart trash can. Sean went on to build and showcase his invention, the eCan, at several hackathons across NYC and at the Big Apps competition at which Emrals received accolades for its mission to help reduce litter through civic engagement. The first six prototypes of the eCan were sold to a university, a Business Improvement District, and a commercial space. Get to know Emrals and join them on Twitter.
 
KPLUSC
KPLUSC’s compost bin removes food waste and turns it into pure organic fertilizer that sustains and renews the earth. And, they’re trying to do it in a way that’s 50 times faster than the traditional way of composting. Their design looks great and fits seamlessly into every kitchen. Get to know KPLUSC and join them on Instagram.
 
INVIP 
After winning a Google Hackathon in Buenos Aires with an app that recognized grocery items, INVIP realized the idea could be useful for people who suffer from vision loss. They started collaborating with Edson Tapia, who is blind, to figure out how they could improve his daily life with technology. INVIP uses Amazon Alexa and Raspberry Pi to create a novel, mobile assistive technology that works like a personal assistant for the blind with simple questions like “What’s in front of me?” INVIP has been awarded several prizes from New York University (InnoVention, Summer Launchpad, I-Corps, Prototyping Fund) and is dedicated to make new technologies affordable and accessible to everyone. They’re working with NYU and the New York Public Library – Andrew Heiskell Braille and Talking Book Library. Get to know INVIP.
 
Lookalu
Trying to quickly grab that precious photo of your smiling three-month-old? FaceTiming with Grandma but can’t get the little guy to focus? Getting a baby to actually look at the camera can seem impossible. Inevitably, parents are forced into a desperate and humiliating game of clapping, yelling, jumping, waving, and funny-face making. Enter Lookalu, the easiest way to capture your baby’s beautiful moments. They’ve created a clip for smartphones with a cast of plush-toy characters that bring their products to life. Lookalu is a smartphone accessory that instantly grabs and holds your baby’s attention for that perfect shot. Simply clip your Lookalu to any device, rattle your device to get your baby’s attention, and take your photo or video. And when your little one wants to play with one of our adorable, friendly characters, simply detach the plush toy from the clip, and your baby has a new friend. Get to know Lookalu.


MedicaSafe
Delivery of better health outcomes without disrupting lives is a foundational design principle for MedicaSafe. Their product, Regi, makes complicated, high-risk outpatient therapy manageable for the most vulnerable patients. Regi will recognize bottles or blister-packs as they come prescribed (so there’s no complicated loading), direct patients to take the right medication at the right time with friendly , and sense and communicate adherence data at the single-dose level. Roughly 50% of patients do not take their medication as directed and nonadherence is responsible for up to 25% of excess hospitalizations and readmissions. Get to know MedicaSafe and join them on Twitter.


Peris
With more than 60 people dying every day in the U.S. from a prescription opioid overdose, Peris is at the forefront of combatting the opioid epidemic. We empower users through preventing medication overuse by providing them with a proper medium which regulates their medication intake. Peris produces affordable, portable, and secure pill bottles that only dispense the prescribed dosage at the prescribed time. By preventing medication overuse, we significantly reduce the risk of addiction or a deadly overdose. Peris is changing the way people take their medication. Get to know Peris and follow us on LinkedIn.
 
Quark
Quark uses technology to prevent crashes from happening. Through proximity sensors and crowdsourced cyclist data, they’re able to provide bikes with safer and better rides. Quark is a member of the Zahn Innovation Center Summer 2017 accelerator.
 
R3 Printing
After years of running a 3D printer out of their college dorm room, the partners at R3 Printing dove feet first into tackling the most pressing problem faced by 3D printer users worldwide: how to get their hardware to deliver a perfect print the first time. Based on their years of hands-on experience, R3 Printing is developing products which specifically address the hardware issues found in most on-the-market 3D Printers. Get to know R3 Printing.
 
Secco
Secco is developing novel hardware and technology to disrupt the way people clean clothing. Their machine dries, sanitizes and deodorizes clothing in minutes – or seconds – using much less energy, no soap and no water. The idea was prompted when Erika Ostroff was at USC and balancing a full-time job. She’d wake up in downtown at the crack of dawn, exercise somewhere en route to Yahoo’s offices in Santa Monica, work until 5 pm, drive back to school, attend night class, go home, and start from the top. She’d return home after 12+ hour days with wet, sweaty clothes in plastic bags that were provided by gyms and studios. It occurred to her that it would be so convenient if she could just dry her clothes after working out. She finished school, was relocated to work in New York, but was still facing the same predicament. Erika fortuitously connected with Arjen, and together they sought out a solution with a goal of quick-drying clothes, while sanitizing and deodorizing them in the process. The chemistry – literally and figuratively – was perfect. And it dawned on them: The process of cleaning clothes had yet to be disrupted. Get to know Secco.
 
SyStem
SyStem is a team of individuals who are really excited about the future of urban agriculture. As climate change and sustainability become increasingly important issues, it only makes sense that food should be grown where it is intended to be eaten. Their team is working tirelessly to build automated plant growing systems which collect many points of data and use this data to track the entire growth cycle of the plant and manipulate hardware such as lights, heaters and nutrient solutions so that plants get exactly what they need when they need it. They are currently working with mentors at the Zahn Center and the New York Business Plan. Get to know SyStem.
Wax Rax
Wax Rax is vinyl record storage, re-mastered. Founded in 2013 by David Stanavich, Wax Rax boutique manufactures the world’s finest vinyl media access units and accessories. Their unique, patented products provide stylish access to a vinyl library. Designed exclusively for analog audio, the Wax Rax catalog includes carts, consoles, stands and shelving that display and access 1 to 700 records. Built with pride in New York City, Wax Rax’s furniture is constructed from anodized aluminum, brass, steel and stainless steel. Wax Rax furniture is sustainable though its high level of craft and quality of materials. Get to know Wax Rax and join them on Instagram and Twitter.
May 24, 2017/by Greg Spielberg

http://futureworks.nyc/wp-content/uploads/2017/05/Incubator-track-2.jpg
1058
1500

Greg Spielberg

https://dev-futureworks.pantheonsite.io/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/futureworks_large_rgb.svg

Greg Spielberg2017-05-24 18:13:272017-05-24 19:43:54Futureworks Incubator launches with 32 Market Validation startups (Here's 17-32)Companies, Featured, Resources & Education  What skills gap? How Bushwick’s Total Metal Resource built a team of 2,000 local welders			 January 25, 2017Early last Spring, Bushwick-based Total Metal Resource won a contract with Riverside Developers to make 2,000 simple steel pieces for The William Vale Hotel in Williamsburg. With his four-person team already committed to other projects, Founder Scott Behr didn’t want to scour Craigslist and expand his staff with cold hires. Then he remembered that through TMR’s Metal Shop Fantasy Camp, he’d taught 900 New Yorkers basic welding and metal work. Behr reached out to the community and quickly recruited 20 temporary hires to work in four-hour shifts. Less than three weeks later, TMR delivered the job.
 Read more  →
January 25, 2017/by Greg Spielberg

http://futureworks.nyc/wp-content/uploads/2017/02/Futureworks-TMR.jpg
368
700

Greg Spielberg

https://dev-futureworks.pantheonsite.io/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/futureworks_large_rgb.svg

Greg Spielberg2017-01-25 16:41:172017-02-11 23:26:37What skills gap? How Bushwick’s Total Metal Resource built a team of 2,000 local weldersCompanies, Press  StrongArm CEO Sean Petterson leads Forbes 30 Under 30: Manufacturing & Industry selections			 January 11, 2017Sean Petterson, CEO of StrongArm Technologies and a former NYCEDC Next Top Makers Fellow, was picked for this year’s Forbes 30 Under 30 list. The national honor recognizes StrongArm’s dedication to keeping blue-collar workers safer and Petterson’s success in building his startup. His Navy Yard-based team is 15 people strong and plans a trio of hires in the first quarter says CMO Matt Norcia.
 Read more  →
January 11, 2017/by FutureWorks

http://futureworks.nyc/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/futureworks-nyc-forbes-strongarm.png
431
700

FutureWorks

https://dev-futureworks.pantheonsite.io/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/futureworks_large_rgb.svg

FutureWorks2017-01-11 18:02:202017-02-14 14:27:08StrongArm CEO Sean Petterson leads Forbes 30 Under 30: Manufacturing & Industry selectionsCompanies  Going back in time with fabric designer Maddy Maxey			 December 23, 2016Maddy Maxey: Smart fabric inventor, fashion designer, creative technologist. Founder of Loomia, 2013 Thiel Fellow, Forbes 30 Under 30 winner, Autodesk Pier 9 Resident, and, since last week, Marie Claire Young Women’s Honors awardee. She’s collaborated with Google and Zac Posen, advised the White House and is starting to develop ideas with Topshop. Maddy’s everywhere, so it feels like she’s been around forever, even though the Navy Yard-based designer is only 23. We asked Maddy to pause for a minute to chat about what she’s learned from the people, and places, she’s collaborated with. Starting with a near-catastrophic encounter with a London cab:  
 Read more  →
December 23, 2016/by FutureWorks

http://futureworks.nyc/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/Michael-Kovac-Getty-Futureworks-Maddy-Maxey.png
650
1024

FutureWorks

https://dev-futureworks.pantheonsite.io/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/futureworks_large_rgb.svg

FutureWorks2016-12-23 21:44:312017-03-07 14:56:25Going back in time with fabric designer Maddy MaxeyCompanies  Catching up with Bre Pettis on the launch of his new startup, Bre & Co.			 December 5, 2016We sat down with Bre before his Dec 6 pop up, which you can RSVP for here.

Bre Pettis says he doesn’t want to scale, and his Bre & Co. headquarters at the Navy Yard looks it. There’s no white board, no calendar, no prototypes, no boxes of takeout. A giant Persian rug and a circle of 1930s arm chairs cover the middle of the floor. Abstract and landscape art decorate the white walls and an Electric Objects digital frame plays soothing Tumblr gifs. Exposed ceiling beams match the long wooden table lined by Meiji-style stools. But the Makerbot Replicator 2 next to the coat rack is a reminder that Pettis is an expert scaler.  Read more  →
December 5, 2016/by FutureWorks

http://futureworks.nyc/wp-content/uploads/2016/12/bre-pettis-bre-and-co-futureworks.jpg
540
700

FutureWorks

https://dev-futureworks.pantheonsite.io/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/futureworks_large_rgb.svg

FutureWorks2016-12-05 19:45:202017-03-06 17:34:43Catching up with Bre Pettis on the launch of his new startup, Bre & Co.Companies  Touring Boyce, New York’s most innovative advanced manufacturer			 November 4, 2016http://www.cybermondaylululemon.us.comlululemon yoga black friday
Tucked away in the manufacturing hub of Long Island City is Boyce Technologies, New York City’s most dynamic company. With back-to-back rankings on the Inc 5000 list, Boyce is good as building products as it is at turning down buyout offers. Founded in 2007, Boyce is riding 905% growth over the past three years, generates $29M in yearly revenue and is #6 on Inc’s list for national manufacturers. Their success is one of the reasons Sen. Kirsten Gillibrand paid a visit during her recent Manufacturing Communities Act tour. Read more  →
November 4, 2016/by FutureWorks

http://futureworks.nyc/wp-content/uploads/2016/11/boyce-technologies-futureworks-nyc.png
266
700

FutureWorks

https://dev-futureworks.pantheonsite.io/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/futureworks_large_rgb.svg

FutureWorks2016-11-04 18:24:522017-03-07 15:34:50Touring Boyce, New York's most innovative advanced manufacturerCompanies, Press  TechCrunch on BotFactory’s $1.3 million investment round			 October 6, 2016“Their first product, the Squink, took off. They’ve already shipped 106 machines and they’re on track to ship a dozen more. The Squink is obviously a niche product – not all of us need pick-and-place machines in the office – but it’s a great start for a fascinating project. The kit uses conductive ink or solder and can place components right on a circuit board.”
Read more on TechCrunch
October 6, 2016/by Greg Spielberg

http://futureworks.nyc/wp-content/uploads/2016/10/botfactory-press.png
701
700

Greg Spielberg

https://dev-futureworks.pantheonsite.io/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/futureworks_large_rgb.svg

Greg Spielberg2016-10-06 14:27:252017-02-14 14:30:07TechCrunch on BotFactory's $1.3 million investment roundCompanies  How BREAKFAST turned social media into an Internet of Things industry			 September 28, 2016Cate Blanchett hangs out with BREAKFAST’s Luster at an Armani event in London. Credit: BREAKFAST 
Last month we wrote about the rise of manufacturing agencies in New York City. Rather than mass-produce on the assembly line, companies like SITU Studio create custom products for specific clients. It’s part of a larger zero-inventory movement that includes 3D-printing manufacturers like Voodoo and 3D Hubs. Creative-service clients and on-demand production gives NYC entrepreneurs tremendous flexibility in how to build revenue and where to set up shop. Down the street from SITU’s Dumbo HQ, we visited another manufacturing agency: the award-winning rapid product and prototype company BREAKFAST.  Read more  →
September 28, 2016/by FutureWorks

http://futureworks.nyc/wp-content/uploads/2016/09/Cate-Blanchett-at-an-Armanis-event-in-London.jpg
589
700

FutureWorks

https://dev-futureworks.pantheonsite.io/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/futureworks_large_rgb.svg

FutureWorks2016-09-28 20:21:422017-03-07 15:17:16How BREAKFAST turned social media into an Internet of Things industry







Brought to you byAdvertise hereOrganizing PartnersCommunity PartnersFutureworks ShopsAdvertise hereContact Shoot us an email, and we'll get right back to you!
[email protected] 
Get Social With Us futureworksnyc

futureworksnyc
Join Our Community 






			(newsletter signup)		




Email Address
























Scroll to top





RaceYa, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg








































  





















































































July 28, 2017 8:39 AM ET

Company Overview of RaceYa, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
RaceYa, Inc. was incorporated in 2014 and is based in New York, New York.


175 Varick StreetNew York, NY 10014United StatesFounded in 2014



Phone: 646-575-5704








Key Executives for RaceYa, Inc.




Mr. Abigail Edgecliffe-Johnson


      	President and Director
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 	Aryzta Us Holdings I Corp. United States 	Michael Anthony Hernandez, A Professional Corp United States !SOLUTIONS! Group United States "Atlantic Tele-Satellite, Inc. United States "D" Construction, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact RaceYa, Inc., please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Rayalab.com - 300 Vitamin B Day Cream


















 FDA Registered 






 
 

Marketing Guidelines


Sampling Program
Company Profile
Private Label Options
Ordering Info
Contact Info
Product Manual
Home Page



 

Products


Cleansers
Toners
Moisturizers
Nourishing
Age Controls
Masques
Problem Skin
Alpha-Hydroxy
SPA and Body
Depilatory



 

Prices 


Products
Bulk
Retail size prices




Helpful Links 


Ingredients
Conversions
World Clock
Calendar
World Weather




Feedback 


Feedback Info








USA: 1-(800)-525-7292    INTERNATIONAL:-(818)-763-7292    FAX: 1-(818)-760-1069    E-mail: rosawest@aol.com
























Retail  size 2 oz.






300 Vitamin-B Cream





This highly effective, yet very light, day cream is recommended for normal to oily, blemished and problem skin. A complex of natural botanical extracts, vitamins, and amino acids help to moisturize and balance the skin, while natural Vitamin B Complex (Yeast Extract) helps to regulate oil gland secretion to reduce the possibility of clogged pores, inflammations, and breakouts associated with an oily skin condition and the use of make-up products. After cleansing and toning, use once or twice daily.





Contains:





Aloe Vera Gel, Stearic Acid, Dimethicone, Glycerin, Decyl Oleate, Cetyl Alcohol, Sodium Alginate, Aquas Extracts of Chamomile, and Cucumber, Blackcurrant Extract, Tamarind Extract, Apple Extract, Yeast Extract (Vitamin B), Carbomer, Ginseng Extract, Allantoin, d-Penthanol, Retinyl Palmitate, Glucose, Fructose, Sucrose, Dextrin, Glutamic Acid, Phenoxyethanol, Guar Gum, Sodium PCA, Tocopheryl Acetate (Vitamin E), Retinyl Palmitate (Vitamin A), Ascorbyl Palmitate, Triethanolamine, Sodium Hyaluronate, Potassium Sorbate, Sodium Benzoate, Citric Acid.





Caution:





Avoid contact with eyes and mucous membranes. Keep out of reach of children. Use only as directed.





Professional in salon use: 





This non-greasy, water based oil control formula can be used as a final step in oily and blemished skin facial by applying over moist skin. Designed to be compatible with Camphor Soufflé, Mint Soufflé and Active Cleansing Gel cleansers, and Camphor, Eucalyptus or Blemish control astringents. For a more aggressive treatment Glycolic gel GX50 or Blemish control gel can be used prior to cream application. This cream does not leave residue.





Key ingredient functions and product benefits:





It is important to maintain a regular moisturizing routine to keep the skin from becoming too irritated or dry. Dehydrated oily skin can result in breakouts as the skin overcompensates by producing more oil. An oil control moisturizer may be desired in order to reduce shine and maintain skin’s moisture balance, therefore reducing the need for make up powders (which can contain pore clogging ingredients). The primary cause of dryness in oily skin is excessive water evaporation from the skin surface. Rich in humectants (the substances that can trap and hold water) this product helps to keep the skin hydrated while controlling oil overproduction. Amino acid complex, Dimethicone, Glycerin, Sodium PCA, and Sodium Hyaluronate provide moisture binding activity. Fruit extracts of Blackcurrant, Tamarind, and Apple help to balance the skin’s pH and control bacteria. Yeast Extract (Vitamin B) controls oil. Allantoin and Aloe Vera help to soothe problem skin. Absorbs rapidly providing immediate hydration.















Professional size



























 

Marketing Guidelines


Sampling Program
Company Profile
Private Label Options
Ordering Info
Contact Info
Product Manual
Home Page




Products


Cleansers
Toners
Moisturizers
Nourishing
Age Controls
Masques
Problem Skin
Alpha-Hydroxy
SPA and Body
Depilatory




Prices 


Products
Bulk
Retail size prices




Helpful Links


Ingredients
Conversions
World Clock
Calendar
World Weather




Feedback


Feedback Info















Copyright@2000-2014   Privacy policy









Rayalab.com - S-101 Purifying Body Cleanser


















 FDA Registered






 
 

Marketing Guidelines


Sampling Program
Company Profile
Private Label Options
Ordering Info
Contact Info
Product Manual
Home Page



 

Products


Cleansers
Toners
Moisturizers
Nourishing
Age Controls
Masques
Problem Skin
Alpha-Hydroxy
SPA and Body
Depilatory



 

Prices 


Products
Bulk
Retail size prices




Helpful Links 


Ingredients
Conversions
World Clock
Calendar
World Weather




Feedback 


Feedback Info








USA: 1-(800)-525-7292    INTERNATIONAL:-(818)-763-7292    FAX: 1-(818)-760-1069    E-mail: rosawest@aol.com







































Retail size 8 oz.






S-101 Purifying Body Cleanser





The Purifying Body Cleanser is a gentle and detoxifying body cleanser that prepares the body to receive exfoliating, nourishing, and moisturizing treatments. It also helps to remove any residue remaining after such treatments. This cleanser is recommended for all skin types. The outstanding cleansing and softening qualities of the Purifying Body Cleanser, allow you to use this product as an excellent conditioning hair and scalp shampoo. Use by applying onto moistened skin (or hair), working up a lather, then rinse with warm water. It is recommended to use a body scrub prior to this product. Follow with a body milk, oil, or nourishing cream for maximum hydration.





Contains:





Aloe Vera Gel, Sodium Laureth Sulfate, Cocamidopropyl Hydroxysultaine and Erucamidopropyl Hydroxysultaine and PEG-150 Pentaerythrityl Tetrastearate, Oleyl Betaine, Propylene Glycol, Seaweed Extract, Witch Hazel Extract, Arnica Blossom Extract, Sodium Hyaluronate, Natural Fragrant Oil, Glycolic Acid, Sodium Chloride, Phenoxyethanol, Potassium Sorbate, Sodium Benzoate.





Caution:


Avoid contact with eyes and mucous membranes. Keep out of reach of children. Use only as directed.












Professional size 16 oz.








 
 

















 

Marketing Guidelines


Sampling Program
Company Profile
Private Label Options
Ordering Info
Contact Info
Product Manual
Home Page




Products


Cleansers
Toners
Moisturizers
Nourishing
Age Controls
Masques
Problem Skin
Alpha-Hydroxy
SPA and Body
Depilatory




Prices 


Products
Bulk
Retail size prices




Helpful Links


Ingredients
Conversions
World Clock
Calendar
World Weather




Feedback


Feedback Info















Copyright@2000-2014   Privacy policy









Rayalab.com - 600 Skin Recovery Masque


















 FDA Registered 






 
 

Marketing Guidelines


Sampling Program
Company Profile
Private Label Options
Ordering Info
Contact Info
Product Manual
Home Page



 

Products


Cleansers
Toners
Moisturizers
Nourishing
Age Controls
Masques
Problem Skin
Alpha-Hydroxy
SPA and Body
Depilatory



 

Prices 


Products
Bulk
Retail size prices




Helpful Links 


Ingredients
Conversions
World Clock
Calendar
World Weather




Feedback 


Feedback Info








USA: 1-(800)-525-7292    INTERNATIONAL:-(818)-763-7292    FAX: 1-(818)-760-1069    E-mail: rosawest@aol.com































600 SKIN RECOVERY MASQUE





This creamy, emollient rich, antioxidant and multi-vitamin treatment mask is designed to enhance micro-circulation, improve epidermal regeneration, and naturally brighten your skin complexion. Sea Buckthorn Berry delivers effective restorative properties due to its high content of essential fatty acids, carotenes, tocopherols, and phytosterols. Elements which are all essential for healthy skin. Nutrient rich carrot oil, mango butter, and natural plant extracts help to increase the skin moisture level, oxygen uptake, and prevent early appearance of wrinkles.





Contains:





Aloe Vera Gel, Cetyl Alcohol, Glycerin, Zinc Oxide, Glyceryl Stearate, Titanium Dioxide, Sesame Oil, Safflower Oil, Squalene, Guar Gum, Sea Buckthorn Berry Oil, Carrot Oil, Extracts of Chamomile, Ginseng, Cucumber, and Ginkgo Biloba, Phenoxyethanol, Retinyl Palmitate, Tocophyrol, Ascorbyl Palmitate and Magnesium Ascorbyl Phosphate, Mango Butter, Fragrant Oils, Sodium Hyaluronate, Palmitoyl Oligopeptide, Palmitoyl Tetrapeptide-7, Marine Collagen, Potassium Sorbate, Sodium Benzoate, Citric Acid. Caution: Avoid contact with eyes and mucous membranes. Keep out of reach of children. Use only as directed.





Caution:





Avoid contact with eyes and mucous membranes. Keep out of reach of children. Use only as directed.





Professional in salon use:





This is a  moisture rich, creamy, whipped soufflé consistency nourishing mask with  a light berry scent. The yellow color comes from Carrot Oil and Sea  Buckthorn Oil. It is a non-setting type of phytotherapy mask (does not  dry on the skin). Use of masks following serums and creams improves  treatment properties and absorption of these products. Mask’s  properties could be customized to clients needs by blending appropriate  serums (Vital Silk, Vitanol A, Line Preventing Serum) and creams  (Vitaplex C, Revitalizing Cream, Bio Effective Night Cream), directly  into the mask prior to skin application. A flash “moisture boost”  effect helps to seal in the active ingredients contained in this  treatment.





In-Salon application:





Analyze your  client’s skin to determine the correct treatment mask to use. Remove  enough mask for one application with a disposable spatula from the bulk  container and place in a smaller container for skin application or  custom blending. Use on cleansed skin. Before proceeding protect the  client’s eyes with cotton pads dampened in warm water. Apply a thick  layer with a brush, spatula or fingertips (a nickel-sized amount or  more) over the entire face starting with the neck line, then jaws,  cheeks, chin, nose and forehead. Avoid applying mask to lips, mouth,  hairline, eyebrows and the area around the eyes. Ask the client if they  are comfortable. Leave on for 5 to 15 minutes. The mask should be  removed with tepid to warm water and cotton. Tone and refresh with  appropriate toner (Aloe Cucumber or Ginseng Toners) and follow with a  moisturizer or specialty product. Remove cotton pads from the client’s  eyes. For combination skin types, two masks can be used at the same  time. Mild masks formulated for oily skin (Volcanic Mud Mask, Mint  Mask) can be used on oily areas, and masks formulated for dry skin  (Skin Recovery Mask, Collagen Cream Mask, Placenta Nourishing Mask) on  the dry areas. For non-sensitive, dryer skin types can be used as a  final emollient, calming, moisturizing and skin protective mask  following in-salon procedures (Micro-Dermabrasion, Glycolic, Enzymes,  LED).





Key ingredient functions and product benefits: 





Helps to  reduce visible signs of aging, Supplies vital nutrients to the skin.  Promotes skin balance and comfort. Sesame Oil, Safflower Oil, Squalane,  Mango Butter, Glycerin and Carrot Oil protect from moisture loss and  provide nourishment to the skin. Retinyl Palmitate, Tocophyrol and  Ascorbyl Palmitate show skin renewal properties, help to calm  inflammation and refine pores. Ginseng Extract, Sea Buckthorn Oil and  Aloe Vera Gel provide soothing and healing properties. Collagen, a  soluble protein, effectively helps to diminish wrinkles and age lines  while restoring elasticity to skin. Contains Pentapeptides for improved  Collagen and Elastin production to further reduce and slow the  formation of new lines and wrinkles. 
































 

Marketing Guidelines


Sampling Program
Company Profile
Private Label Options
Ordering Info
Contact Info
Product Manual
Home Page




Products


Cleansers
Toners
Moisturizers
Nourishing
Age Controls
Masques
Problem Skin
Alpha-Hydroxy
SPA and Body
Depilatory




Prices 


Products
Bulk
Retail size prices




Helpful Links


Ingredients
Conversions
World Clock
Calendar
World Weather




Feedback


Feedback Info















Copyright@2000-2014   Privacy policy









Rayalab.com - 101 Camphor Souffle


















 FDA Registered 






 



Marketing Guidelines


Sampling Program
Company Profile
Private Label Options
Ordering Info
Contact Info
Product Manual
Home Page


 



Products


Cleansers
Toners
Moisturizers
Nourishing
Age Controls
Masques
Problem Skin
Alpha-Hydroxy
SPA and Body
Depilatory


 



Prices 


Products
Bulk
Retail size prices


 


Helpful Links 


Ingredients
Conversions
World Clock
Calendar
World Weather


 

Feedback 


Feedback Info








USA: 1-(800)-525-7292    INTERNATIONAL:-(818)-763-7292    FAX: 1-(818)-760-1069    E-mail: rosawest@aol.com



 





















Retail  size 4 oz. and 8 oz.






101 Camphor Soufflé





Camphor Soufflé is a powerful pH balanced facial cleanser recommended for normal to oily and problem skin. It is highly effective on blemished skin. It instantly softens the tap water, dissolving the heavy sebum which usually clogs blemished pores. Use twice daily, massage onto the skin and rinse with tepid water. Follow with Camphor or Menthol Astringent (for oily skin) or Blemish Control Astringent, Eucalyptus AHA Toner and Bio-Drying Lotion (on blemished skin), then Vitamin B day cream or Azulen day cream or other cream suitable for skin type.





Contains:





Aloe Vera Gel, Stearic Acid, Hydrogenated Polyisobutane, Herb Extracts: (Ivy and Watercress and Lime Tree and Lavender and Soap Wort), Cetyl Alcohol, Dimethicone Copolyol, Triethanolamine, Lauroamphocarboxyglycinate and Sodium Trideceth Sulfate , Camphor, Clove Oil, Phenoxyethanol, Potassium Sorbate, Sodium Benzoate.





Caution:





Avoid contact with eyes and mucous membranes. Keep out of reach of children. 

               	      Use only as directed.





Professional in salon use: 





Can be used as a disincrustation cleanser for oily and problem skin types prior to extractions to soften and dissolve oils and pollutants congesting the skin (apply to face with water, lather then steam 2-5 minutes. Proceed with extraction). For sensitive skin do not steam. Could be followed by Camphor Astringent for disinfection. Then Enzyme Peeling Cream for exfoliation and Bio Drying or Blemish Control Mask for soothing. A second mask can be used for moisturizing (Cucumber Ice Sorbet or Azulen Mask). Can be used as lipid layer neutralizer prior to AHA or Enzyme in-salon treatment.





Key ingredient functions and product benefits:





A deep pore cleanser with decongestive and anti-irritation activity. A Smooth whipped souffle consistency. Removes surface dead cell build-up, impurities and pore blockage. Promotes anti-bacterial activity. Helps to promote clear and smooth complexion. Can be used as a luxurious facial shaving cream. Camphor, Clove Oil and five Herbal extracts help to cleanse and rejuvenate oily and blemished skin.















Professional size 16 oz.



























 

Marketing Guidelines


Sampling Program
Company Profile
Private Label Options
Ordering Info
Contact Info
Product Manual
Home Page




Products


Cleansers
Toners
Moisturizers
Nourishing
Age Controls
Masques
Problem Skin
Alpha-Hydroxy
SPA and Body
Depilatory


 

Prices 


Products
Bulk
Retail size prices





Helpful Links


Ingredients
Conversions
World Clock
Calendar
World Weather




Feedback


Feedback Info















Copyright@2000-2014   Privacy policy























































































Female Founder Spotlight: STEM-Focused Tech Startups Tickets, Wed, Jul 27, 2016 at 7:30 PM | Eventbrite




















Skip Main Navigation





Eventbrite






Search menu



Search for events

















                    Browse Events
                


Learn More 




                                Blog
                            



                                Resources
                            



                                Fees
                            



                                How it works
                            



                                Features
                            



                                Music Ticketing
                            





Help 



                                    Where are my tickets?
                                    


                                    How to contact the event organizer
                                    



                                Help Center
                            







Menu




Help

Sign in

Create Event




Sign in

Create Event





Page Content






























		Sales Ended
	

















Jul
27



Female Founder Spotlight: STEM-Focused Tech Startups





				by Tech Chat XX
			






	$3.80












Actions and Detail Panel









Female Founder Spotlight: STEM-Focused Tech Startups

							Wed, July 27, 2016, 7:30 PM – 9:30 PM EDT
						





								Sales Ended
							





















Details















Event Information




Share this event


Date and Time




Wed, July 27, 2016
7:30 PM – 9:30 PM EDT

Add to Calendar







Location


Location

Knotel Battery
1 State Street 
Floor 25 
New York, NY 10004 

View Map
View Map






Friends Who Are Going







Friends Who Are Going
 Connect to Facebook


Friends Attending







Friends Attending


None yet



Settings





Friends Attending


Whoops! Couldn't connect



Settings



















Event description


Description



Changing the Way We Learn: Featuring Abigail Edgecliffe-Johnson, Founder of Raceya, and Krystal Persaud, Director of Product Design at littleBits
Join us for an event showcasing two impressive STEM-focused startups. We are excited to welcome as speakers Abigail Edgecliffe-Johnson, founder of RaceYa, as well as Krystal Persaud, Director of Product Design at littleBits. These two start-ups will walk us through the highs and lows of starting a company, what powers them through each day, and why STEM-related products have become so popular in recent years. Come ready with questions for this intimate evening as we celebrate our second ever Tech Chat XX event. 
This event will be led by Guest Moderator, Lauren Covello, editor of Fortune Venture at Fortune Magazine. 

When: Wednesday, July 27th, 7:30pm - 9:30pm
Where: Knotel | 1 State Street, Floor 25
Admission: $5 | Covers refreshments and snacks

Agenda: 
7:30 - 7:45pm | 20 minutes for networking, drinking & snacking
7:50 - 8:00pm | Welcome from TechChatXX and introduction of RaceYa & littleBits
8:00 - 8:30pm | Q&A led by Lauren Covello
8:30 - 8:45pm | Audience Q & A
8:45 - 9:00pm | Wrap-up & final networking (+ more drinking, snacking)



Guest Moderator - Lauren Covello

As editor of Fortune’s Venture section, Lauren Covello manages the online coverage of entrepreneurs, intrapreneurs and small business. Lauren was formerly managing editor of Entrepreneur.com, the digital arm of Entrepreneur magazine. She joined Entrepreneur in July 2013 after more than five years at Fox Business, where she was a reporter, editor and booker. Prior to that, Lauren was an assistant buyer at Saks Fifth Avenue and a graduate of the company's management training program. Lauren graduated from NYU with a B.A. in journalism and a minor in art history. She was named one of Folio's Top Women in Media in 2015.




Featured Speaker: Abigail Edgecliffe-Johnson
Abigail Edgecliffe-Johnson is the founder of RaceYa, an educational platform that uses radio-controlled cars to teach kids science and engineering; in other words - a vehicle for STEM.  She has a PhD in Anthropology from Columbia University as well as several years of experience as a Maker, Baker and Tinkerer. She uses her research chops to understand how and why kids play and learn the way they do, while she uses her baking and making skills to create the best possible play experience from within which kids can learn.  Before founding RaceYa, she worked in public policy helping to align government policy with the lived experience of drug users.  She’s also the mother to two moderately hilarious kids.  



Featured Speaker: Krystal Persaud
Krystal Persaud is the Director of Product Design & Product Management at littleBits, the award-winning platform of electronic building blocks that is empowering everyone to create inventions, large and small. A graduate of the Georgia Tech School of Industrial Design, Krystal is also the founder and managing member of the design collective Grouphug and teaches a course on product development processes & materials at the New Jersey Institute of Technology. Krystal is committed to the idea that product design will revolutionize the fields of education, public health and sustainability, and is passionate about bridging gaps between industrial design and other disciplines.



Read more
Read less






Tags


Tags




Things to do in New York, NY




Seminar




Science & Tech








Share with friends




Share with friends












Date and Time




Wed, July 27, 2016
7:30 PM – 9:30 PM EDT

Add to Calendar



Location

Knotel Battery
1 State Street 
Floor 25 
New York, NY 10004 

View Map
View Map






Friends Who Are Going
 Connect to Facebook


Friends Attending







Friends Attending


None yet



Settings





Friends Attending


Whoops! Couldn't connect



Settings


















Map and Directions



View Map







		Female Founder Spotlight: STEM-Focused Tech Startups
		at
		Knotel Battery
		


				1 State Street Floor 25, New York, NY 10004
		














Event Ended




Female Founder Spotlight: STEM-Focused Tech Startups




View Details



View Details







					Events you might like:
				








$20



					Wed, Aug 23
					7:30 PM
			

				Drink & DrawBots
			

				Open Source Gallery, Brooklyn
			




#ScienceTech
#Class




Share this event















$495 - $745



					Mon, Aug 7
					9:00 AM
			

				kidOYO Summer 2017 [Mineola HS] August 7th - August 11th *Wk6*
			

				Mineola High School, Mineola
			




#ScienceTech
#Retreat




Share this event















$495 - $745



					Mon, Jul 31
					9:00 AM
			

				kidOYO Summer 2017 [Mineola HS] July 31st - August 4th *Wk5*
			

				Mineola High School, Mineola
			




#ScienceTech
#Retreat




Share this event















Free



					Tue, Sep 19
					6:00 PM
			

				WIT@Pace - Pleasantville
			

				Pace University - Pleasantville Campus, Pleasantville
			




#ScienceTech
#Networking




Share this event















Free



					Wed, Aug 16
					6:30 PM
			

				Galvanize New York - Topics in JavaScript: Introduction to React
			

				Galvanize, New York
			




#ScienceTech
#Networking




Share this event















Free



					Wed, Aug 2
					6:30 PM
			

				SeamlessGov x HackerNest: Women in Tech Panel @ Rise New York
			

				Rise New York, New York
			




#ScienceTech
#Networking




Share this event















Free



					Thu, Aug 17
					6:30 PM
			

				AfriStack Web Dev Workshop: CSS, HTML AND Javascript - 5 Complimentary sessions
			

				Microsoft, New York
			




#ScienceTech
#Class




Share this event















Free



					Wed, Aug 9
					6:30 PM
			

				Galvanize New York - Topics in JavaScript: Data Visualization with D3
			

				Galvanize, New York
			




#ScienceTech
#Networking




Share this event















Free



					Sat, Aug 19
					2:00 PM
			

				OPEN House STEM After School Coding Academy
			

				50 Clinton St, Hempstead
			




#ScienceTech




Share this event















$150 - $300



					Sun, Aug 6
					2:00 PM
			

				Biotech Crash Course
			

				Genspace, Brooklyn
			




#ScienceTech
#Class




Share this event











Save This Event

Log in or sign up for Eventbrite to save events you're interested in.


				Sign Up
			

Already have an account? Log in



Event Saved











			Contact the organizer
	




					Your message has been sent!
				






						Your email will only be seen by the event organizer.
					

Find out more about how your privacy is protected.










						Your Name
					






						Email Address
					






						Message
					







							Enter the code as shown below:
						













							Send message
						

							Please wait...
						


						Cancel
					






					Close
				











Copy Link



Copy Event URL






Social Settings

Events are social. Allow Facebook friends to see your upcoming events?





Yes (Recommended)
Yes (Recommended)



No, keep my events secret
No, keep my events secret


Save







Save This Event

Log in or sign up for Eventbrite to save events you're interested in.


				Sign Up
			

Already have an account? Log in



Event Saved




















































RaceYa - Graphis


















                    Sorry, full access to our website is available to  Only!
                    
Become a Member today and get benefits listed below.
                



Return Home





Graphis

Competitions









RaceYa





0

















View Bio
View Enlarged Images
View Full Credits





Award
Platinum


Agency
Level Design Group (NYC)


Client
RaceYa


Designer
Jennifer Bernstein
Eva Surany


Category
Retail


Country
United States of America







Award
Platinum


Agency
Level Design Group (NYC)


Client
RaceYa


Designer
Jennifer Bernstein
Eva Surany


Category
Retail


Country
United States of America




Title
RaceYa


Creative Director
Jennifer Bernstein


Art Director
Nicholas Hubbard 
Jennifer Bernstein


Design Firm
Level Design Group (NYC)






Assignment


RaceYa is an emerging company dedicated to developing fun and creative STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics) educational toys. Level Design Group was asked to craft a brand identity to represent the company and their customizable build-your-own toys, beginning with their first product: a radio-controlled car. It was important to our client that the brand personified their target audience — kids united by play, creativity and discovery. The RaceYa identity aims to replace stereotypes with skills, specifically making the involvement and inclusion of girls in STEM activities a high priority. The inclusionary and gender-neutral nature of the company’s mission, and their products, had to be represented in the visual identity — appealing and inviting to both girls and boys equally.






Approach


We developed a clean, playful mark that communicates to a target audience of 8-12 year old’s who are curious about STEM, as well as their tech-savvy and design-conscious parents. Simple lines, rounded letterforms, classic iconography and a lively, diverse color palette were important in order to establish an aesthetic for the brand personality. The custom-made lowercase letterforms are geometric and bold, yet friendly in their rounded corners, large counters, and unified in their tight letter-spacing. The repetition of rounded letterforms hint at motion or wheels “turning.” The single-storey a’s add a handwritten and elementary quality to the word. The shortened descender of the y suggests a ligature to the key icon. The key, an iconic reference of the history of mechanical toys, adopts the forms of the letters to seamlessly work into the logotype, and provide a small break/moment of pause between the two words without completely disconnecting them. The mark's use of multiple colors reflects the modular nature of the products themselves, and will inform the development of a way finding  system for curriculum. There was also a need for an abbreviated mark, for applications on small parts. The key, as a mark itself, is iconic – a modern take on the endearing past-time of play. Additionally, Level created a logo animation for use in web venues in which the reveal of the logo and use of sound suggest a mechanical object – the key is wound, then released, revealing the logo in full.






Results


Having reached their funding goal this past November, RaceYa is now preparing for an official product launch in 2017 — completing their third generation prototype vehicles, coding libraries and curriculum, and expanding on content and customization platforms. The identity has been rolled out in business collateral, company website, social media venues, and crowdfunding portals, as well as promotional materials in print and online. 
To keep with the brand personality we established, RaceYa’s curriculum will be designed to mimic the way kids play — not a "lesson plan,” but a choose-your-own-adventure-book for science. This unique format will invite users to create their own playtime narrative, and learn more about areas of STEM that they are personally interested in. Also in the works — a web platform to function as a worldwide community of RaceYa users, able to learn, share, and collaborate in a digital/virtual space. This online community is essential to establishing the brand culture.






Contact Information




Company Name
Level Group


Phone
212-594-2522


Email
jennifer@levelnyc.com


Website
levelnyc.com


Address
57 West 28th Street3rd floorNew York, NY10001 US









Related Entries
View All




















































Loading
Loading





Graphis
RaceYa
Exit Fullscreen





















RaceYa Branding - Graphis


















                    Sorry, full access to our website is available to  Only!
                    
Become a Member today and get benefits listed below.
                



Return Home





Graphis

Competitions









RaceYa Branding





0


































View Bio
View Enlarged Images
View Full Credits





Agency
Level Group


Client
RaceYa


Designer
Jennifer Bernstein
Eva Surany


Category
Retail


Country
United States of America


Title
RaceYa Branding







Agency
Level Group


Client
RaceYa


Designer
Jennifer Bernstein
Eva Surany


Category
Retail


Country
United States of America


Title
RaceYa Branding




Creative Director
Jennifer Bernstein


Art Director
Nick Hubbard


Video Link
https://vimeo.com/leveldesigngro...


Design Firm
Level Group






Assignment


RaceYa is dedicated to developing fun and creative STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics) educational toys. Level was asked to craft a brand identity to represent the company and their customizable build-your-own toys, beginning with their first product: a radio-controlled car. It was important to our client that the brand personified their target audience — kids united by play, creativity and discovery. The RaceYa identity aims to replace stereotypes with skills, specifically making the involvement and inclusion of girls in STEM activities a high priority. The inclusionary and gender-neutral nature of the company’s mission, and their products, had to be represented in the visual identity — appealing and inviting to both girls and boys equally.






Approach


We developed a clean, playful mark that communicates to a target audience of 8-12 year old’s who are curious about STEM, as well as their tech-savvy and design-conscious parents. Simple lines, rounded letterforms, classic iconography and a lively, diverse color palette were important in order to establish an aesthetic for the brand personality. The custom-made lowercase letterforms are geometric and bold, yet friendly in their rounded corners, large counters, and unified in their tight letter-spacing. The repetition of rounded letterforms hint at motion or wheels “turning.” The single-story a’s add a handwritten and elementary quality to the word. The shortened descender of the y suggests a ligature to the key icon. The key, an iconic reference of the history of mechanical toys, adopts the forms of the letters to seamlessly work into the logotype, and provide a small break/moment of pause between the two words without completely disconnecting them. The mark's use of multiple colors reflects the modular nature of the product components. There was also a need for an abbreviated mark, for applications on small parts. The key, as a mark itself, is iconic — a modern take on the endearing past-time of play. Additionally, Level created a logo animation for use in web venues in which the reveal of the logo and use of sound suggest a mechanical object — the key is wound, then released, revealing the logo in full. You can find a link to the Video in the Credit Section above.






Results


Having reached their funding goal this past November, RaceYa is now preparing for an official product launch in 2017 — completing their third generation prototype vehicles, coding libraries and curriculum, and expanding on content and customization platforms. The identity has been rolled out in business collateral, company website, social media venues, and crowdfunding portals, as well as promotional materials in print and online.
To keep with the brand personality we established, RaceYa’s curriculum will be designed to mimic the way kids play — not a "lesson plan,” but a choose-your-own-adventure-book for science. This unique format will invite users to create their own playtime narrative, and learn more about areas of STEM that they are personally interested in. Also in the works — a web platform to function as a worldwide community of RaceYa users, able to learn, share, and collaborate in a digital/virtual space. This online community is essential to establishing the brand culture.






Contact Information




Company Name
Level Group


Phone
212-594-2522


Email
jennifer@levelnyc.com


Website
levelnyc.com


Address
57 West 28th Street3rd floorNew York, NY10001 US









Related Entries
View All




















































Loading
Loading





Graphis
RaceYa Branding
Exit Fullscreen


























